lang/id/src/hyph-id.hyp.txt
a-a
a-a-bi-no-min
a-an
a-ba
a-ba-a-ba
a-ba-a-ka
a-ba-di
a-ba-di-ah
a-ba-di-at
a-ba-han
a-ba-hu-i
a-ba-jang
a-ba-ka
a-ba-kus
a-ba-la-lu
a-ba-lo-ne
a-ba-nat
a-ba-no
a-ba-rum-bung
a-ba-si-a
a-ba-te
a-ba-ti-sa-si
a-ba-tis
a-ba-to-ar
a-ba-ton
a-ba-wi
a-ba-ya
a-bab
a-bad
a-bah
a-bah-a-bah
a-bai
a-bai-an
a-bai-ma-na
a-bal
a-bal-a-bal
a-bam
a-ban
a-ban-di-ra
a-ban-do-ne-men
a-bang
a-bang-an
a-bang-da
a-bang-ga
a-bap
a-bar
a-bar-a-bar
a-bar-an
a-bas
a-bas-a-bas
a-bat
a-bau
a-be
a-be-ce
a-be-li
a-be-ra-si
a-bek
a-ben
a-ber
a-bet
a-bi
a-bi-an
a-bi-din
a-bi-ka-ra
a-bi-la
a-bi-lah
a-bi-ma-na
a-bi-na
a-bi-o-ge-ne-sis
a-bi-o-ge-nik
a-bi-o-lo-gi
a-bi-o-sen
a-bi-o-ses-ton
a-bi-o-sfer
a-bi-o-tik
a-bi-o-tro-fi
a-bi-sal
a-bi-se-ka
a-bi-so-ben-tos
a-bi-so-pe-la-gik
a-bi-ti
a-bi-tu-ri-en
a-bib
a-bib-li-o-fo-bi-a
a-bid
a-bih
a-bing
a-bir
a-bis
a-bit
a-bo
a-bo-a
a-bo-bo
a-bo-li-si
a-bo-ma-sum
a-bo-ne
a-bo-ne-men
a-bo-o-spo-ra
a-bo-ri-gin
a-bo-toi
a-bo-ya
a-boi
a-bon
a-bong-a-bong
a-bor
a-bor-si
a-bor-ti-va
a-bor-tif
a-bor-tus
a-bot
a-bu
a-bu-a-bu
a-bu-an
a-bu-bu
a-bu-da-ga
a-bu-do
a-bu-i
a-bu-ja
a-bu-ka-jung
a-bu-li-a
a-bu-lus
a-bu-mi
a-bu-ra-ge
a-bu-ya
a-bu-za
a-buh
a-buh-a-buh-an
a-buh-an
a-buk
a-buk-a-buk
a-bul
a-bul-ha-yat
a-bun
a-bun-a-bun
a-bung
a-bur
a-bur-an
a-bus
a-but
a-but-men
a-ca-bis
a-ca-la
a-ca-ra
a-ca-ra-ki
a-ca-ram
a-ca-wi
a-cah
a-cak
a-cak-a-cak
a-cak-a-cak-an
a-cak-a-dul
a-cak-a-dut
a-can
a-can-a-can
a-cang
a-cang-a-cang
a-cap
a-cap-a-cap
a-cap-ka-li
a-car
a-car-ya
a-cat
a-cat-an
a-cau
a-ce
a-ce-ka-rom
a-ce-rang
a-ceh
a-ceng
a-ci
a-ci-a-ci
a-ci-a-ci-an
a-ci-a-ci-nya
a-ci-an
a-ci-nga-ra
a-cik
a-cin-ti-a
a-co
a-co-a-co-an
a-co-an
a-cok
a-cop
a-cu
a-cu-an
a-cu-ci
a-cuh
a-cuh-an
a-cum
a-cum-an
a-cung
a-cung-an
a-da
a-da-a-da
a-da-a-da-nya
a-da-a-da-nya-kah
a-da-bi-ah
a-da-ci
a-da-gi-o
a-da-gi-um
a-da-i-ni
a-da-ka-la
a-da-ka-la-nya
a-da-kah
a-da-kan
a-da-la-bang
a-da-la-pur
a-da-lah
a-da-lat
a-da-mat
a-da-mu
a-da-ngi-yah
a-da-nya
a-da-pun
a-da-pus
a-da-ru-sa
a-da-ti
a-da-tu-ang
a-dab
a-dad
a-dah
a-dak
a-dak-til
a-daks
a-dam
a-dan
a-dang
a-dang-a-dang
a-dap-a-dap-an
a-dap-ta-bel
a-dap-ta-bi-li-tas
a-dap-ta-si
a-dap-ter
a-dap-tif
a-dap-to-gen
a-dap-to-me-ter
a-dap-tor
a-dar
a-dar-gom
a-das
a-dat
a-dau
a-de
a-de-a-bi-a-sang
a-de-gan
a-de-ku-at
a-de-lo
a-de-ma-ra-ja
a-de-na
a-de-ni-na
a-de-ni-um
a-de-nin
a-de-no-id
a-de-no-kar-si-no-ma
a-de-no-ma
a-de-no-pa-ti
a-de-no-si-na
a-de-no-sis
a-de-no-sit
a-de-no-vi-rus
a-de-nob-las
a-de-rang
a-de-si
a-deg
a-deh
a-dei
a-dek
a-del-fo-ga-mi
a-del-fo-pa-ra-sit
a-dem
a-dem-pau-ze
a-den-da
a-den-dum
a-dep-a-dep
a-der-ma-to-gli-fi-a
a-dhan
a-di
a-di-a-ba-tik
a-di-a-bat
a-di-a-di
a-di-a-fa-nus
a-di-a-fo-ra
a-di-a-rus
a-di-ak-sa
a-di-ak-ti-nik
a-di-ba-ha-sa
a-di-ba-sa
a-di-bang-kit
a-di-bi-bit
a-di-bin-tang
a-di-bo-ga
a-di-bu-sa-na
a-di-bud-dha
a-di-ci-ta
a-di-da-ya
a-di-di
a-di-di-ngin
a-di-gang
a-di-gu-na
a-di-gung
a-di-hab-lur
a-di-han-tar
a-di-ja-na
a-di-je-nuh
a-di-ka
a-di-ka-ra
a-di-kar-ya
a-di-ke-ki-si
a-di-kod-ra-ti
a-di-kong
a-di-ku-a-sa
a-di-la-ga
a-di-lu-hung
a-di-ma-nu-si-a
a-di-mar-ga
a-di-mas
a-di-na-mi-a
a-di-pa-ti
a-di-par-wa
a-di-pat-ni
a-di-pe-ra-ga-wan
a-di-pek-to-mi
a-di-peng-han-tar
a-di-po-sa
a-di-po-si-tas
a-di-po-sit
a-di-pu-i-si
a-di-pu-ra
a-di-pur-na
a-di-ra-ja
a-di-rat-na
a-di-sat-ri-a
a-di-se-ni
a-di-si
a-di-si-o-nal
a-di-sis-wa
a-di-ta-ma
a-di-ti
a-di-tif
a-di-to-koh
a-di-to-ri-um
a-di-wa-ca-na
a-di-wang-sa
a-di-war-na
a-di-was-tra
a-di-wi-ca-ra
a-di-wi-di-a
a-di-wi-ra
a-di-wi-ya-ta
a-di-yu-ga
a-di-yus-wa
a-dib
a-dik
a-dik-an-da
a-dik-ber-a-dik
a-dik-si
a-dik-sim-ba
a-dik-tif
a-dil
a-din-da
a-ding
a-dip-si-a
a-dit
a-dit-ya
a-dit-ya-war-man
a-do-be
a-do-du-i
a-do-le-sens
a-do-lu
a-do-ra
a-do-ra-si
a-dok
a-don
a-don-an
a-dong
a-dop-si
a-dop-si-an
a-dop-tif
a-du
a-du-a-du
a-du-an
a-du-hai
a-du-sen
a-du-tan
a-duh
a-duk
a-duk-a-duk
a-duk-a-duk-an
a-duk-an
a-duk-si
a-duk-tor
a-dum
a-dum-la
a-dun
a-dun-an
a-dung
a-dur
a-dzab
a-dzan
a-e-lo-tro-pik
a-e-mo-no
a-e-ni
a-e-o-li-an
a-e-o-lus
a-e-ra-si
a-e-ra-tor
a-e-ri-al
a-e-ro
a-e-ro-ba-tik
a-e-ro-bi-ka
a-e-ro-bi-o-lo-gi
a-e-ro-bi-o-skop
a-e-ro-bik
a-e-ro-di-na-mi-ka
a-e-ro-di-na-mik
a-e-ro-di-na-mis
a-e-ro-di-ne
a-e-ro-fi-a-ro-lo-gi
a-e-ro-fi-si-ka
a-e-ro-fi-si-o-lo-gi
a-e-ro-fo-bi-a
a-e-ro-fon
a-e-ro-graf
a-e-ro-gram
a-e-ro-ko-ri
a-e-ro-lit
a-e-ro-lo-gi
a-e-ro-lo-gis
a-e-ro-mag-ne-tik
a-e-ro-me-ka-ni-ka
a-e-ro-me-ter
a-e-ro-mo-nas
a-e-ro-mo-vel
a-e-ro-mor-fo-sis
a-e-ro-nau-si-fo-bi-a
a-e-ro-nau-ti-ka
a-e-ro-nau-ti-kal
a-e-ro-naut
a-e-ro-no-mi
a-e-ro-plank-ton
a-e-ro-po-lis
a-e-ro-po-nik
a-e-ro-sis-ta
a-e-ro-skop
a-e-ro-so-li-sa-si
a-e-ro-sol
a-e-ro-sta-ti-ka
a-e-ro-stat
a-e-ro-tak-sis
a-e-ro-te-ra-pi
a-e-ro-to-le-ran
a-e-ro-to-no-me-ter
a-e-ro-tro-pis-me
a-e-ro-tro-po-lis
a-e-rob
a-e-si
a-e-ti-o-lo-gi
a-em
a-es-te-ti-ka
a-fa
a-fa-far
a-fa-gi-a
a-fa-go-sis
a-fa-ir
a-fa-ki-a
a-fa-ni-tik
a-fa-nis-me
a-fa-no-plas-mo-di-um
a-fa-ra
a-fa-si-a
a-fa-si-o-lo-gi
a-faf-te-ma
a-fan-to-bi-on
a-fe-re-sis
a-fe-ren
a-fe-sis
a-fe-tu-o-so
a-fek
a-fek-si
a-fek-ti-fi-tas
a-fek-ti-vi-tas
a-fek-tif
a-fi-an
a-fi-at
a-fi-bri-no-ge-ne-mi-a
a-fi-da-vit
a-fi-di-ko-la
a-fi-di-vor
a-fi-far
a-fi-li-a-si
a-fi-li-a-tor
a-fi-ni-tas
a-fi-tik
a-fik-sa-si
a-fiks
a-fir-ma-si
a-fir-ma-tif
a-fo-ga-to
a-fo-ka
a-fo-ni-a
a-fo-re
a-fo-re-fe
a-fo-res-ta-si
a-fo-tik
a-fo-to-trop-is-me
a-for-is-me
a-fu-ah
a-fu-i
a-ga
a-ga-di
a-ga-han
a-ga-lak-si-a
a-ga-ma
a-ga-ma-is
a-ga-ma-is-me
a-ga-ma-ni
a-ga-ma-wan
a-ga-ma-wi
a-ga-man-dro-e-sis
a-ga-me-on
a-ga-men
a-ga-met
a-ga-mi
a-ga-mis
a-ga-mo-bi-um
a-ga-mo-dem
a-ga-mo-ge-ne-sis
a-ga-mo-gi-no-e-sis
a-ga-mo-go-ni
a-ga-mo-her-ma-fro-dit
a-ga-mo-sper-mi
a-ga-mo-trop
a-ga-mon
a-ga-pe
a-ga-ri-ko-la
a-ga-ro-sa
a-gad
a-gah
a-gai
a-gai-ne
a-gak
a-gak-a-gak
a-gak-a-gih
a-gak-nya
a-gal
a-gam
a-gan
a-gan-ta
a-gar
a-gar-a-gar
a-gas
a-gas-tya
a-gau
a-ge
a-ge-ga
a-ge-is-me
a-ge-man
a-ge-ne-sis
a-ge-u-si-a
a-gel
a-gem
a-gen
a-gen-da
a-gen-si
a-gen-tif
a-gens
a-ger
a-gi
a-gi-e
a-gi-o
a-gi-ri-a
a-gi-ro-fo-bi-a
a-gi-ta-si
a-gi-ta-tif
a-gi-ta-tor
a-gi-um
a-gih
a-gih-an
a-gil
a-git
a-go
a-go-go
a-go-me-ter
a-go-nan
a-go-ni
a-go-ni-a
a-go-ni-sis
a-go-nis
a-go-nis-tik
a-go-ra-fo-bi-a
a-go-u-ti
a-goh
a-gok
a-gon
a-gu
a-guk
a-gul
a-gun
a-gun-an
a-gung
a-gus
a-gus-ti-ni-an-is-me
a-gus-tus
a-gus-tus-an
a-gut
a-gut-a-gut
a-ha
a-ha-di-at
a-ha-ko-re
a-ha-na-wan
a-ha-re
a-ha-sa-le
a-ha-un
a-had
a-hai
a-hang
a-has
a-hau
a-he
a-he-rat
a-her-ma-ti-pe
a-het
a-hi
a-hi-do
a-hi-lo-so
a-hi-log-no-si-a
a-hi-rat
a-hi-re
a-him-sa
a-hin
a-hing
a-hir
a-his-to-ris
a-hit
a-ho
a-ho-la
a-ho-ri
a-hoi
a-hu-du
a-hu-i-te
a-hu-ne-yo
a-hu-ni
a-hu-tu
a-huh
a-hum
a-i-boh-fo-bi-a
a-ib
a-ih
a-il
a-in
a-ip-da
a-ir
a-ir-lang-ga
a-is
a-is-a-is
a-ja
a-ja-ib
a-ja-ra
a-jab
a-jai
a-jak
a-jak-a-jak
a-jak-an
a-jal
a-jang
a-jar
a-jar-a-jar
a-jar-an
a-je-ngan
a-je-ran
a-jeg
a-jek-ti-va
a-jek-tif
a-jen
a-jen-dam
a-jen-rem
a-jeng
a-ji
a-ji-a-ji
a-ji-an
a-ji-gi-neng
a-ji-mat
a-ji-sa-ka
a-jib
a-jik
a-jing
a-jir
a-jo
a-jo-jing
a-jo-li
a-jo-ngi
a-ju
a-ju-a-ju
a-ju-an
a-ju-dan
a-ju-fan
a-ju-jah
a-ju-man
a-ju-na
a-ju-van
a-juh
a-juk
a-jun
a-jung
a-jur
a-jus
a-jus-ter
a-ka
a-ka-bri
a-ka-de-mi
a-ka-de-mi-a
a-ka-de-mi-kus
a-ka-de-mi-si
a-ka-de-mik
a-ka-de-mis
a-ka-id
a-ka-la-si-a
a-ka-pe-la
a-ka-ri-do-fag
a-ka-ri-o-sit
a-ka-ri-ot
a-ka-ri-si-da
a-ka-ro-fi-li
a-ka-ro-fit-is-me
a-ka-ro-fo-bi-a
a-ka-ro-lo-gi
a-ka-ro-ros
a-ka-ro-se-si-di-um
a-ka-ro-ta
a-ka-ru-rit
a-ka-sa
a-ka-si-a
a-ka-ta-la-se-mi-a
a-ka-ta-lep-si-a
a-ka-to-pi
a-kad
a-kai
a-kak
a-kal
a-kal-a-kal
a-kal-a-kal-an
a-kam-si
a-kan
a-kan-a-kan
a-kan-an
a-kang
a-kap
a-kap-ni-a
a-kar
a-kar-a-kar-an
a-kas
a-ke
a-ke-kah
a-ke-kun
a-ke-lit
a-ke-ne
a-kei
a-keul
a-kha-zah
a-khe-rat
a-khi
a-khi-rat
a-khi-ru-sa-nah
a-khi-rul-ka-lam
a-khir
a-khir-a-khir-nya
a-khir-an
a-khir-nya
a-ki
a-ki-a-ki
a-ki-bat
a-ki-bat-nya
a-ki-dah
a-ki-kah
a-ki-lah
a-ki-ne-si-a
a-ki-ne-sis
a-ki-ne-tik
a-ki-ne-top-si-a
a-ki-net
a-ki-yo-wa
a-kik
a-kil
a-king
a-kit
a-klu-o-fo-bi-a
a-ko
a-ko-la-de
a-ko-ma-ta
a-ko-mo-da-si
a-ko-mo-da-tif
a-ko-mo-dir
a-ko-ni-ta-se
a-kod
a-kok
a-kon
a-kon-dro-pla-si-a
a-kor
a-kor-de-o-nis
a-kor-de-on
a-kra-si-a
a-ku
a-ku-a
a-ku-a-des
a-ku-a-des-ti-la-ta
a-ku-a-duk
a-ku-a-fa-ba
a-ku-a-fal-fa
a-ku-a-kak-tin
a-ku-a-kul-tur
a-ku-a-lung
a-ku-a-ma-rin
a-ku-a-naut
a-ku-a-po-nik
a-ku-a-rel
a-ku-a-ri-um
a-ku-a-ri-us
a-ku-a-ris
a-ku-a-tik
a-ku-a-to-se-re
a-ku-an
a-ku-as-kap
a-ku-as-tat
a-ku-duk-tus
a-ku-e-duk
a-ku-e-ne
a-ku-i-fer
a-ku-i-si-si
a-ku-le-a
a-ku-mu-la-si
a-ku-mu-la-tif
a-ku-mu-la-tor
a-ku-o-i-on
a-ku-o-ko-ba-la-min
a-ku-pre-sur
a-ku-pun-tur
a-ku-punk-tu-ris
a-ku-punk-tur
a-ku-ra-si
a-ku-rat
a-ku-sa-tif
a-ku-wu
a-kuk
a-kul-tu-ra-si
a-kun
a-kun-ta-bel
a-kun-ta-bi-li-tas
a-kun-tan
a-kun-tan-si
a-kur
a-kus
a-kus-ti-ka
a-kus-tik
a-kut
a-la
a-la-an
a-la-bang-ka
a-la-es-te-si-a
a-la-ha-ta
a-la-li-a
a-la-ma
a-la-ma-tul-ha-yat
a-la-mah
a-la-mai
a-la-man-da
a-la-mas
a-la-mat
a-la-me-te
a-la-mi
a-la-mi-ah
a-la-min
a-la-na
a-la-ne
a-la-ni-na
a-la-pa-ri
a-la-pi-ah
a-la-ri-ma
a-la-ta
a-la-ti
a-la-tud
a-la-wa-ta-e
a-la-zon
a-lab
a-lad
a-laf
a-lah
a-lah-an
a-lah-meng-a-lahi
a-lai
a-lai-be-lai
a-lak
a-lak-ri-ma
a-lam
a-lan
a-lan-a-lan
a-lan-sa-ra
a-lan-to-i-nat
a-lan-to-in
a-lan-to-is
a-lan-to-ko-ri-on
a-lang
a-lang-a-lang
a-lang-a-lang-an
a-lang-an
a-lang-ga-ya
a-lang-kah
a-lang-ki-ta-e
a-lap
a-lap-a-lap
a-lar
a-lar-wa-le
a-larm
a-las
a-las-a-la-san
a-las-an
a-las-to-no
a-lat
a-lau
a-lay
a-le-go-ri
a-le-go-ris
a-le-gre-to
a-le-gro
a-le-ka-wang
a-le-lo-gen
a-le-lo-ki-mi-a
a-le-lo-morf
a-le-lo-pa-ti
a-le-lo-ti-pe
a-le-na
a-le-pa
a-le-to-fi-li
a-le-to-fit
a-le-u-ron
a-le-u-rop-las
a-le-wa-ra-i
a-le-war
a-le-woh
a-lei
a-lek
a-lek-na
a-lek-san-drit
a-lek-si-a
a-lek-sin
a-lek-to-ro-fo-bi-a
a-lel
a-lem
a-lem-an
a-len
a-lep
a-ler
a-ler-ge-nik
a-ler-gen
a-ler-gi
a-ler-gis
a-li
a-li-a-grem
a-li-a-li
a-li-a-se
a-li-ah
a-li-an-si
a-li-ang
a-li-as
a-li-bi
a-li-dad
a-li-e-na-si
a-li-en
a-li-fa-tik
a-li-fu-ru
a-li-ga-tor
a-li-ga-ya-fe
a-li-ku-ot
a-li-ku-su
a-li-la
a-li-li-u
a-li-men
a-li-men-ta-si
a-li-men-ter
a-li-mi-ah
a-li-mi-at
a-li-mu-nan
a-li-mun
a-li-ne-a
a-li-no
a-li-sik-lik
a-li-te-ra-si
a-li-um-fo-bi-a
a-li-wa-da-la
a-li-yah
a-li-za-rin
a-lif
a-lif-a-lif-an
a-lif-ba-ta
a-lih
a-lih-a-lih
a-lik
a-lim
a-lim-bu-a-ne
a-lim-bu-bu
a-lin
a-ling
a-ling-a-ling
a-ling-a-ling-an
a-ling-an
a-ling-ki-ta-e
a-lins
a-lip
a-lip-a-lip-an
a-lir
a-lir-an
a-lis
a-lis-a-lis-an
a-lit
a-lo
a-lo-a-lo
a-lo-bar
a-lo-co
a-lo-di-ni-a
a-lo-dok-sa-fo-bi-a
a-lo-fan
a-lo-fon
a-lo-gen
a-lo-gi-a
a-lo-go-tro-fi-a
a-lo-graf
a-lo-he-te-ro-plo-id
a-lo-hos-pes
a-lo-in
a-lo-ka-si
a-lo-kai
a-lo-karp
a-lo-ki-ne-sis
a-lo-kro-mi
a-lo-kron
a-lo-lek-to-ti-pe
a-lo-leks
a-lo-long
a-lo-me-ris-me
a-lo-mon
a-lo-mor-fo-sis
a-lo-morf
a-lo-morf-is-me
a-lo-nim
a-lo-pa-ra-sit
a-lo-pa-ti
a-lo-pat-rik
a-lo-pe-la-gik
a-lo-pe-si-a
a-lo-plas-ma
a-lo-plo-id
a-lo-po-li-plo-id
a-lo-sa
a-lo-sin-de-sis
a-lo-som
a-lo-su
a-lo-te-tu-a
a-lo-term
a-lo-tet-ra-plo-id
a-lo-ti-pe
a-lo-tri-plo-id
a-lo-tro-pi
a-lo-tro-pik
a-lo-trof
a-lo-trop
a-lo-trop-is-me
a-lo-un
a-lo-zim
a-lod-na
a-loi
a-lok-se-ni-a
a-lok-to-nus
a-lok-ton
a-lon
a-lon-a-lon
a-long
a-long-ins
a-lop-tik
a-lor
a-los-te-rik
a-lot
a-lu
a-lu-a-kas
a-lu-a-lu
a-lu-a-lu-an
a-lu-ang
a-lu-e
a-lu-fi-ru
a-lu-la
a-lu-mi-na
a-lu-mi-ni-um
a-lu-mi-num
a-lu-mu-ni-um
a-lu-ne
a-lu-o
a-lu-si
a-lu-tan
a-lu-vi-a-si
a-lu-vi-al
a-lu-vi-um
a-lu-wa-na
a-lum
a-lum-bu
a-lum-ni
a-lum-nus
a-lum-pa
a-lun
a-lun-a-lun
a-lun-an
a-lun-dum
a-lung
a-lup
a-lur
a-lur-a-lur
a-lur-a-lur-an
a-lur-an
a-lut-sis-ta
a-lut-ta
a-ma
a-ma-bak-du
a-ma-ha-tua
a-ma-hai
a-ma-la-ka
a-ma-la-ki
a-ma-li
a-ma-li-ah
a-ma-lo
a-ma-na-tun
a-ma-nah
a-ma-nat
a-ma-ne
a-ma-ngo
a-ma-ni-tin
a-ma-nu-ban
a-ma-nu-e
a-ma-rah
a-ma-ren-dra
a-ma-ri-lis
a-ma-ti
a-ma-tir
a-ma-tir-a-ma-tir-an
a-ma-tir-is-me
a-ma-to
a-ma-to-fit
a-ma-to-fo-bi-a
a-ma-tol
a-ma-u
a-maf
a-mah
a-mai
a-mai-a-mai
a-mak
a-mak-so-fo-bi-a
a-mal
a-mal-an
a-mal-ga-ma-si
a-mal-ga-ma-tor
a-mal-gam
a-mam
a-man
a-man-de-men
a-man-del
a-man-ra
a-man-ta-din
